North Dakota, session 69, HB1087.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-27-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
26.1-27-03. Certificate of authorityLicense required - Penalty.
1. A person, including a person who directly or indirectly underwrites, collects charges or
premiums from, or adjusts or settles claims on residents of this state in connection with life,
annuity, or health coverage provided by a self-funded plan, may not act as or hold oneself out
to be an administrator in this state, for the kinds of business for which the person is acting as
an administrator, without a certificate of authoritylicense issued by the commissioner. Any
person violating this subsection is guilty of a class C felony.
2. All applications must be accompanied by a filing fee of one hundred dollars.
3. The commissioner shall issue a certificatelicense unless the commissioner after due notice
and hearing determines that the administrator is not competent, trustworthy, financially
responsible, or of good personal and business reputation, or has had a previous application
for an insurance license denied for cause within five years.
4. The administrator shall pay an annual renewal fee of fifty dollars to maintain the
certificatelicense.
5. After notice and hearing, the commissioner may revoke a certificatelicense or fine the
administrator not more than ten thousand dollars, or both, or the commissioner may suspend
a certificatelicense, or fine the administrator not more than five thousand dollars, or both, upon
finding that either the administrator violated section 26.1-27-05 and subsection 4 of section
26.1-27-06 and also violated subsection 1, 2, or 3 of section 26.1-27-06 or section 26.1-27-07,
26.1-27-08, 26.1-27-10, 26.1-27-11, or 26.1-27-12, or the administrator is not competent,
trustworthy, financially responsible, or of good personal and business reputation.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-27.1-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
26.1-27.1-02. Licensing.
A person may not perform or act as a pharmacy benefits manager in this state unless that person
holds a certificate of registrationlicense as an administrator under chapter 26.1-27.

H. B. NO. 1087 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1087.
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 1 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State